Washington statutes.
RCW 41.12.185

Duty of commission to organize and function—Penalty for violation.

It shall be the duty of each commission appointed subject to the provisions of this chapter, to immediately organize and see to it that the provisions thereof are carried into effect, and to this end to make suitable rules and regulations not inconsistent with the purpose of this chapter, for the purpose of carrying the provisions thereof into effect; and the failure upon the part of said commission, or any individual member thereof to do so, shall be deemed a violation of this chapter, and shall be punishable as such.

[ 1937 c 13 s 21; RRS s 9558a-21.]